Alabama, session 2026rs, HB526.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) An entity that employs at least six
individuals and sells or offers for sale goods or services may
not require a buyer to pay using credit, or prohibit cash as
payment, in order to purchase the goods or services through an
in-person transaction. The entity shall accept cash when
offered by the buyer as payment.
(b) Subsection (a) does not apply to the following
entities:
(1) Any entity selling or offering for sale goods or
services at an airport. If a terminal of an airport has more
than two entities selling or offering for sale goods or
Page 1

than two entities selling or offering for sale goods or
HB526 INTRODUCED
services, then the airport shall require two of the entities
to accept cash as payment.
(2) Any parking facility owned by a municipality,
regardless of whether the facility is operated by the
municipality, a parking authority, or an independent third
party.
(3) Any parking facility that only accepts mobile
payment.
(4) Any entity in the business of renting motor
vehicles. If an entity does not accept cash under this
subdivision, the entity shall accept a cashier's check or a
certified check if offered by a buyer as payment.
(5) Any retail entity that provides a device on the
entity's premises which converts cash into a prepaid credit
card and allows a buyer to complete a transaction with the
entity using the prepaid credit card. The device may not
charge a fee or require a minimum deposit amount greater than
five dollars ($5). Upon request of the buyer, the device shall
provide the buyer with a paper or electronic receipt
indicating the amount of cash the buyer deposited onto the
prepaid credit card.
(6) Any public institution of higher education that
provides a location, on campus and during regular business
hours, which converts cash into a prepaid credit card and
allows a buyer to complete a transaction on campus using the
prepaid credit card. The device may not charge a fee or
require a minimum deposit amount greater than five dollars
($5). Upon request of the buyer, the device shall provide the
Page 2

($5). Upon request of the buyer, the device shall provide the
HB526 INTRODUCED
buyer with a paper or electronic receipt indicating the amount
of cash the buyer deposited onto the prepaid credit card.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3